Ohio, session 136, HB1017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.2325 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.2325. The month of September is designated as "STXBP1 Awareness Month," to increase public awareness of pathogenic mutations of the syntaxin binding protein 1 gene and related disorders, which are associated with neurodevelopmental delays, early onset epilepsy, movement disorders, communication issues, and autism spectrum disorder.